Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-216.01
Applicant; certificate; examination; failure to pass; effect.

(1) An applicant who fails to pass the barber examination may take the examination up to two additional times when the examination is offered by the board without being required to take any further course of study. If an applicant fails the examination a third time, the applicant shall be required to complete a further course of study in barbering, consisting of five hundred hours with not more than ten hours completed in any one working day in a school of barbering prior to further examination.

(2) An applicant may be given an opportunity to demonstrate proficiency to waive the remainder of the course of study after completion of two hundred fifty hours with the approval of the board. If such applicant fails the examination after being given such opportunity, the applicant shall complete the remaining two hundred fifty hours before such applicant shall be permitted to take the examination a fifth time.

Laws 1927, c. 163, § 5A, p. 429;

C.S.1929, § 71-2007;

R.S.1943, § 71-207;

Laws 1963, c. 409, § 7, p. 1318;

R.R.S.1943, § 71-207;

Laws 1971, LB 1020, § 30;

Laws 1983, LB 87, § 21;

Laws 2025, LB160, § 1.